Maryland, session 2025, SB0532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–113.1.
(A) AT ANY TIME BEFORE A HEARING IS HELD BY THE HEARING BOARD
UNDER § 3–106 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A POLICE OFFICER WHO IS DENIED A RIGHT
GRANTED BY THIS SUBTITLE MAY APPLY TO THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR AN ORDER
THAT DIRECTS THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY TO SHOW CAUSE WHY THE RIGHT
SHOULD NOT BE GRANTED.
(B) THE POLICE OFFICER SHALL MAKE THE APPLICATION:
(1) IF THE POLICE OFFICER IS AN EMPLOYEE OF A COUNTYWIDE OR
LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, TO THE CIRCUIT COURT OF THE COUNTY IN
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0532*

SENATE BILL 532
WHICH THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY IS LOCATED; AND
(2) IF THE POLICE OFFICER IS AN EMPLOYEE OF A STATEWIDE OR
BICOUNTY LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, TO THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR ANNE
ARUNDEL COUNTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.